Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4052.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 317.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “De novo bank” means a depository institution, as defined in 12 U.S.C. 1813(c), that:
(A) Was first issued a charter or certificate of authority to conduct banking business and
commenced business in this state during the current tax year or in either of the two im-
mediately preceding tax years; and
(B) Is chartered in Oregon.
(b) “De novo bank” does not include a bank that is formed by, merged with or converted
by a taxpayer that has filed a return under this chapter in any preceding tax year.
(2) A credit against taxes that are otherwise due under this chapter is allowed to a tax-
payer that is a de novo bank.
(3) The credit allowed under this section shall be computed by determining the amount
of tax that would otherwise be imposed on a de novo bank under this chapter, but may not
exceed $1 million in each of three consecutive tax years, beginning with the tax year in which
the de novo bank commences business in this state.
(4) Prior to claiming the credit allowed under this section, a taxpayer is required to
demonstrate having obtained, from the Director of the Department of Consumer and Busi-
ness Services, a bank charter under ORS chapter 707 and a certificate of authority to con-
duct banking business in this state.
(5) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the tax liability of the taxpayer
for the tax year.
(6) Any tax credit otherwise allowable under this section that is not used by the taxpayer
in a particular tax year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax liability
for the next succeeding tax year. Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding tax
year may be carried forward and used in the second succeeding tax year, and likewise any
credit not used in that second succeeding tax year may be carried forward and used in the
third succeeding tax year but may not be carried forward for any other succeeding tax year.
Enrolled House Bill 4052 (HB 4052-INTRO) Page 1

(7) The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall adopt rules for the pur-
poses of this section, including policies and procedures for verifying taxpayer eligibility for
the credit allowed under this section.
(8) The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall provide information to the
Department of Revenue about all taxpayers that are eligible for a tax credit under this sec-
tion, if required by ORS 315.058.
SECTION 3. ORS 314.772 is amended to read:
314.772. (1) Except as provided in ORS 314.766 (5)(b), the tax credits allowed or allowable to a
C corporation for purposes of ORS chapter 317 or 318 shall not be allowed to an S corporation. The
business tax credits allowed or allowable for purposes of ORS chapter 316 shall be allowed or are
allowable to the shareholders of the S corporation.
(2) In determining the tax imposed under ORS chapter 316, as provided under ORS 314.763, on
income of the shareholder of an S corporation, there shall be taken into account the shareholder’s
pro rata share of business tax credit (or item thereof) that would be allowed to the corporation (but
for subsection (1) of this section) or recapture or recovery thereof. The credit (or item thereof), re-
capture or recovery shall be passed through to shareholders in pro rata shares as determined in the
manner prescribed under section 1377(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) The character of any item included in a shareholder’s pro rata share under subsection (2)
of this section shall be determined as if such item were realized directly from the source from which
realized by the corporation, or incurred in the same manner as incurred by the corporation.
(4) If the shareholder is a nonresident and there is a requirement applicable for the business tax
credit that in the case of a nonresident the credit be allowed in the proportion provided in ORS
316.117, then that provision shall apply to the nonresident shareholder.
(5) As used in this section, “business tax credit” means the following credits: ORS 315.104
(forestation and reforestation), ORS 315.124 (small forest option), ORS 315.133 (agricultural overtime
pay), ORS 315.138 (fish screening, by-pass devices, fishways), ORS 315.141 (biomass production for
biofuel), ORS 315.156 (crop gleaning), ORS 315.164 and 315.169 (agriculture workforce housing), ORS
315.176 (bovine manure), ORS 315.204 (dependent care assistance), ORS 315.208 (dependent care fa-
cilities), ORS 315.213 (contributions for child care), ORS 315.237 (employee and dependent scholar-
ships), ORS 315.271 (individual development accounts), ORS 315.283 (affordable housing sales), ORS
315.304 (pollution control facility), ORS 315.326 (renewable energy development contributions), ORS
315.331 (energy conservation projects), ORS 315.336 (transportation projects), ORS 315.341
(renewable energy resource equipment manufacturing facilities), ORS 315.354 and 469B.151 (energy
conservation facilities), ORS 315.506 (tribal taxes on reservation enterprise zones and reservation
partnership zones), ORS 315.507 (electronic commerce), ORS 315.514 (film production development
contributions), ORS 315.518 (semiconductors), ORS 315.523 (employee training programs), ORS
315.533 (low income community jobs initiative), ORS 315.593 (short line railroads), ORS 315.640
(university venture development funds), ORS 315.643 (Opportunity Grant Fund contributions), ORS
315.675 (Trust for Cultural Development Account contributions), ORS 317.097 (loans for affordable
housing), ORS 317.124 (long term enterprise zone facilities) and ORS 317.147 (loans for agriculture
workforce housing) and section 9, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2013 (alternative fuel vehicle contrib-
utions), and section 2 of this 2026 Act (de novo banks).
SECTION 4. ORS 318.031 is amended to read:
318.031. It being the intention of the Legislative Assembly that this chapter and ORS chapter
317 shall be administered as uniformly as possible (allowance being made for the difference in im-
position of the taxes), ORS 305.140 and 305.150, ORS chapter 314 and the following sections are in-
corporated into and made a part of this chapter: ORS 315.104, 315.124, 315.133, 315.141, 315.156,
315.176, 315.204, 315.208, 315.213, 315.283, 315.304, 315.326, 315.331, 315.336, 315.506, 315.507, 315.523,
315.533, 315.593 and 315.643 and section 2 of this 2026 Act (all only to the extent applicable to a
corporation) and ORS chapter 317.
Enrolled House Bill 4052 (HB 4052-INTRO) Page 2

SECTION 5. Except as provided in section 2 (6) of this 2026 Act, section 2 of this 2026
Act applies only to Oregon-chartered banks that commence business in this state in tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and before January 1, 2033.
SECTION 6. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House February 24, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by Senate March 4, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4052 (HB 4052-INTRO) Page 3